tests/numerals/percents.yaml
  "px numbers in abl":
    1<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "1%-ыннан"
    2<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "2%-ыннан"
    3<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "3%-ыннан"
    4<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "4%-ыннан"
    5<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "5%-ыннан"
    6<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "6%-ыннан"
    7<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "7%-ыннан"
    8<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "8%-ыннан"
    9<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "9%-ыннан"
    10<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "10%-ыннан"
    11<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "11%-ыннан"
    12<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "12%-ыннан"
    13<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "13%-ыннан"
    14<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "14%-ыннан"
    15<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "15%-ыннан"
    16<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "16%-ыннан"
    17<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "17%-ыннан"
    18<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "18%-ыннан"
    19<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "19%-ыннан"
    20<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "20%-ыннан"
    21<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "21%-ыннан"
    22<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "22%-ыннан"
    23<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "23%-ыннан"
    24<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "24%-ыннан"
    25<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "25%-ыннан"
    26<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "26%-ыннан"
    27<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "27%-ыннан"
    28<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "28%-ыннан"
    29<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "29%-ыннан"
    30<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "30%-ыннан"
    31<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "31%-ыннан"
    32<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "32%-ыннан"
    33<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "33%-ыннан"
    34<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "34%-ыннан"
    35<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "35%-ыннан"
    36<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "36%-ыннан"
    37<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "37%-ыннан"
    38<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "38%-ыннан"
    39<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "39%-ыннан"
    40<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "40%-ыннан"
    41<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "41%-ыннан"
    42<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "42%-ыннан"
    43<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "43%-ыннан"
    44<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "44%-ыннан"
    45<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "45%-ыннан"
    46<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "46%-ыннан"
    47<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "47%-ыннан"
    48<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "48%-ыннан"
    49<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "49%-ыннан"
    50<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "50%-ыннан"
    51<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "51%-ыннан"
    52<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "52%-ыннан"
    53<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "53%-ыннан"
    54<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "54%-ыннан"
    55<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "55%-ыннан"
    56<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "56%-ыннан"
    57<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "57%-ыннан"
    58<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "58%-ыннан"
    59<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "59%-ыннан"
    60<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "60%-ыннан"
    61<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "61%-ыннан"
    62<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "62%-ыннан"
    63<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "63%-ыннан"
    64<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "64%-ыннан"
    65<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "65%-ыннан"
    66<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "66%-ыннан"
    67<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "67%-ыннан"
    68<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "68%-ыннан"
    69<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "69%-ыннан"
    70<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "70%-ыннан"
    71<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "71%-ыннан"
    72<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "72%-ыннан"
    73<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "73%-ыннан"
    74<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "74%-ыннан"
    75<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "75%-ыннан"
    76<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "76%-ыннан"
    77<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "77%-ыннан"
    78<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "78%-ыннан"
    79<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "79%-ыннан"
    80<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "80%-ыннан"
    81<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "81%-ыннан"
    82<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "82%-ыннан"
    83<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "83%-ыннан"
    84<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "84%-ыннан"
    85<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "85%-ыннан"
    86<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "86%-ыннан"
    87<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "87%-ыннан"
    88<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "88%-ыннан"
    89<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "89%-ыннан"
    90<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "90%-ыннан"
    91<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "91%-ыннан"
    92<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "92%-ыннан"
    93<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "93%-ыннан"
    94<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "94%-ыннан"
    95<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "95%-ыннан"
    96<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "96%-ыннан"
    97<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "97%-ыннан"
    98<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "98%-ыннан"
    99<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "99%-ыннан"
    100<num><percent><subst><px3sp><abl> : "100%-ыннан"


  "px numbers in dat":
    1<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "1%-ына"
    2<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "2%-ына"
    3<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "3%-ына"
    4<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "4%-ына"
    5<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "5%-ына"
    6<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "6%-ына"
    7<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "7%-ына"
    8<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "8%-ына"
    9<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "9%-ына"
    10<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "10%-ына"
    11<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "11%-ына"
    12<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "12%-ына"
    13<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "13%-ына"
    14<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "14%-ына"
    15<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "15%-ына"
    16<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "16%-ына"
    17<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "17%-ына"
    18<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "18%-ына"
    19<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "19%-ына"
    20<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "20%-ына"
    21<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "21%-ына"
    22<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "22%-ына"
    23<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "23%-ына"
    24<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "24%-ына"
    25<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "25%-ына"
    26<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "26%-ына"
    27<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "27%-ына"
    28<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "28%-ына"
    29<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "29%-ына"
    30<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "30%-ына"
    31<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "31%-ына"
    32<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "32%-ына"
    33<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "33%-ына"
    34<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "34%-ына"
    35<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "35%-ына"
    36<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "36%-ына"
    37<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "37%-ына"
    38<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "38%-ына"
    39<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "39%-ына"
    40<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "40%-ына"
    41<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "41%-ына"
    42<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "42%-ына"
    43<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "43%-ына"
    44<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "44%-ына"
    45<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "45%-ына"
    46<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "46%-ына"
    47<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "47%-ына"
    48<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "48%-ына"
    49<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "49%-ына"
    50<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "50%-ына"
    51<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "51%-ына"
    52<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "52%-ына"
    53<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "53%-ына"
    54<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "54%-ына"
    55<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "55%-ына"
    56<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "56%-ына"
    57<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "57%-ына"
    58<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "58%-ына"
    59<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "59%-ына"
    60<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "60%-ына"
    61<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "61%-ына"
    62<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "62%-ына"
    63<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "63%-ына"
    64<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "64%-ына"
    65<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "65%-ына"
    66<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "66%-ына"
    67<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "67%-ына"
    68<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "68%-ына"
    69<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "69%-ына"
    70<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "70%-ына"
    71<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "71%-ына"
    72<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "72%-ына"
    73<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "73%-ына"
    74<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "74%-ына"
    75<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "75%-ына"
    76<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "76%-ына"
    77<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "77%-ына"
    78<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "78%-ына"
    79<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "79%-ына"
    80<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "80%-ына"
    81<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "81%-ына"
    82<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "82%-ына"
    83<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "83%-ына"
    84<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "84%-ына"
    85<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "85%-ына"
    86<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "86%-ына"
    87<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "87%-ына"
    88<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "88%-ына"
    89<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "89%-ына"
    90<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "90%-ына"
    91<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "91%-ына"
    92<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "92%-ына"
    93<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "93%-ына"
    94<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "94%-ына"
    95<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "95%-ына"
    96<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "96%-ына"
    97<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "97%-ына"
    98<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "98%-ына"
    99<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "99%-ына"
    100<num><percent><subst><px3sp><dat> : "100%-ына"
